Hawaii statutes.
§134-17 Penalties. (a) If any person
gives false information or offers false evidence of the person's identity in
complying with any of the requirements of this part, that person shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, provided, however that if any person intentionally
gives false information or offers false evidence concerning their psychiatric
or criminal history in complying with any of the requirements of this part,
that person shall be guilty of a class C felony.

(b) Any person who violates section 134-3(a)
shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

(c) Any person who violates section 134-2,
134-4, 134-10, 134-15, or 134-16(a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any
person who violates section 134-3(b) shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and
the firearm shall be confiscated as contraband and disposed of, if the firearm
is not registered within five days of the person receiving notice of the
violation. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 204, §9]

Cross References

Liability of firearm
owners, see §663-9.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next